Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1111.01
Director of Administrative Services; preaudits authorized.

The Director of Administrative Services may authorize departments and agencies to perform their own preaudits, subject to monitoring by the accounting bureau. The preaudits shall be performed in accordance with the provisions of subdivisions (3)(a) through (f) of section 81-1111.

Laws 1999, LB 432, § 1.